Nebraska, session 109, LB435.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB435 LB435
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-5,213, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-5,213 The committee:
(1) May consult with engineering authorities and organizations
concerned with standard safety codes;
(2) Shall recommend to the State Fire Marshal rules and regulations
governing the operation, maintenance, servicing, construction,
alteration, installation, and inspection of conveyances;
(3) Shall recommend to the State Fire Marshal qualifications for
licensure as an elevator mechanic or elevator contractor and conditions
for disciplinary actions, including suspension or revocation of a
license;
(4) Shall recommend to the State Fire Marshal rules and regulations
for temporary and emergency elevator mechanic thirty-day licenses;
(5) Shall recommend to the State Fire Marshal an enforcement program
which will ensure compliance with the Conveyance Safety Act and the rules
and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act. The
enforcement program shall include the identification of property
locations which are subject to the act, issuing notifications to
violating property owners or operators, random onsite inspections and
tests on existing installations, and assisting in development of public
awareness programs; and
(6) Shall make recommendations to the State Fire Marshal regarding
variances under section 81-5,217, continuing education providers under
section 81-5,235 , and license disciplinary actions under section
81-5,237.
Sec. 2. Section 81-5,215, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-5,215 (1) The Conveyance Safety Act applies to the construction,
operation, inspection, testing, maintenance, alteration, and repair of
conveyances. Conveyances include the following equipment, associated
-2-

LB435 LB435
2025 2025
parts, and hoistways which are not exempted under section 81-5,216:
(a) Hoisting and lowering mechanisms equipped with a car which moves
between two or more landings. This equipment includes elevators;
(b) Power driven stairways and walkways for carrying persons between
landings. This equipment includes:
(i) Escalators; and
(ii) Moving sidewalks; and
(c) Hoisting and lowering mechanisms equipped with a car, which
serves two or more landings and is restricted to the carrying of material
by its limited size or limited access to the car. This equipment
includes:
(i) Dumbwaiters;
(ii) Material lifts and dumbwaiters with automatic transfer devices;
and
(iii) Conveyors and related equipment within the scope of American
Society of Mechanical Engineers B20.1, 2012 Edition.
(2) The act applies to the construction, operation, inspection,
maintenance, alteration, and repair of automatic guided transit vehicles
on guideways with an exclusive right-of-way. This equipment includes
automated people movers.
(3) The act applies to conveyances in private residences located in
counties that have a population of more than one hundred thousand
inhabitants at the time of installation. Such conveyances are subject to
inspection at installation but are not subject to periodic inspections.
Sec. 3. Section 81-5,216, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-5,216 The Conveyance Safety Act does not apply to:
(1) Conveyances under the jurisdiction and subject to inspection by
the United States Government;
(2) Conveyances used exclusively for agricultural purposes;
(3) Personnel hoists within the scope of American National Standards
-3-

LB435 LB435
2025 2025
Institute A10.4, 2016 Edition;
(4) Material hoists within the scope of American National Standards
Institute A10.5, 2013 Edition;
(5) Manlifts within the scope of American Society of Mechanical
Engineers A90.1, 2015 Edition;
(6) Mobile scaffolds, towers, and platforms within the scope of
American National Standards Institute A92.10, 2009 Edition A92;
(7) Powered platforms and equipment for exterior and interior
maintenance within the scope of American National Standards Institute
120.1;
(8) Cranes, derricks, hoists, hooks, jacks, and slings within the
scope of American Society of Mechanical Engineers B30.10, 2014 Edition
B30;
(9) Industrial trucks within the scope of American Society of
Mechanical Engineers B56;
(9) (10) Portable equipment, except for portable escalators which
are covered by American National Standards Institute A17.1, 2013 Edition;
(10) (11) Tiering or piling machines used to move materials to and
from storage located and operating entirely within one story;
(11) (12) Equipment for feeding or positioning materials at machine
tools, printing presses, and similar equipment;
(12) (13) Skip or furnace hoists;
(13) (14) Wharf ramps;
(14) (15) Railroad car lifts or dumpers;
(15) (16) Line jacks, false cars, shafters, moving platforms, and
similar equipment used for installing a conveyance by an elevator
contractor;
(16) (17) Manlifts, hoists, or conveyances used in grain elevators
or feed mills;
(17) (18) Dock levelators;
(18) (19) Stairway chair lifts and platform lifts; and
-4-

LB435 LB435
2025 2025
(19) (20) Conveyances in residences located in counties that have a
population of one hundred thousand or less inhabitants.
Sec. 4. Section 81-5,217, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-5,217 (1) The State Fire Marshal shall adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations which establish the regulations for conveyances under the
Conveyance Safety Act. The rules and regulations may include the Safety
Code for Elevators and Escalators, American Society of Mechanical
Engineers A17.1 except those parts exempted under section 81-5,216; the
standards for conveyors and related equipment, American Society of
Mechanical Engineers B20.1; and the Automated People Mover Standards,
American Society of Civil Engineers 21. The State Fire Marshal shall
annually review to determine if the most current form of such standards
should be adopted.
(2) The State Fire Marshal may grant an equivalency request to a
variance from the rules and regulations adopted in subsection (1) of this
section in individual situations upon good cause shown if the safety of
those riding or using the conveyance is not compromised by the
equivalency variance. The State Fire Marshal shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations for the procedure to obtain a variance. The
committee shall make recommendations to the State Fire Marshal regarding
each variance requested. The decision of the State Fire Marshal in
granting or refusing to grant an equivalency request a variance may be
appealed. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.
Sec. 5. Section 81-5,218, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-5,218 Conveyances upon which construction is started subsequent
to January 1, 2008, shall be registered at the time they are completed
and placed in service.
Sec. 6. Section 81-5,219, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-5-

LB435 LB435
2025 2025
amended to read:
81-5,219 On and after January 1, 2008: Prior to any newly installed
conveyance being used for the first time, the property owner or lessee
shall obtain a certificate of inspection from the State Fire Marshal. A
fee established under section 81-5,214 shall be paid for the certificate
of inspection. A licensed elevator contractor shall complete and submit
first-time registrations for new installations to the state elevator
inspector for the inspector's approval. A certificate of inspection shall
be clearly displayed in an elevator car and on or in each other
conveyance.
Sec. 7. Section 81-5,221, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-5,221 (1) The State Fire Marshal shall employ a state elevator
inspector who shall work under the direct supervision of the State Fire
Marshal or the State Fire Marshal's designee.
(2) The person so employed shall be qualified by (a) not less than
five years' experience in the installation, maintenance, and repair of
elevators as determined by the State Fire Marshal, (b) certification as a
qualified elevator inspector by an association accredited by the American
Society of Mechanical Engineers, or (c) not less than five years'
journeyman experience in elevator installation, maintenance, and
inspection as determined by the State Fire Marshal and shall be familiar
with the inspection process and rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated under the Conveyance Safety Act.
(3) The State Fire Marshal may employ deputy inspectors possessing
the same qualifications as the state elevator inspector as necessary to
carry out the Conveyance Safety Act.
Sec. 8. Section 81-5,223, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-5,223 (1) No inspection shall be required under the Conveyance
Safety Act when an owner or user of a conveyance: obtains an inspection
-6-

LB435 LB435
2025 2025
by a representative of a reputable insurance company licensed to do
business in Nebraska, obtains a policy of insurance from such company
upon the conveyance and files with the State Fire Marshal a certificate
of inspection by such insurance company, files a statement that such
conveyance is insured, and pays an administrative fee established
pursuant to section 81-5,214.
(a) Obtains and submits to the State Fire Marshal a certificate of
inspection from a third-party inspection company;
(b) Obtains a policy of insurance upon the conveyance from a
licensed insurance company;
(c) Files a statement that such conveyance is insured; and
(d) Pays an administrative fee established pursuant to section
81-5,214.
(2) No inspection shall be required under the act when there has
been an annual inspection under a city ordinance which meets the
standards of the act.
Sec. 9. Section 81-5,230, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-5,230 (1) Any person wishing to engage in the work of an elevator
mechanic shall apply for and obtain an elevator mechanic license from the
State Fire Marshal. The application shall be on a form provided by the
State Fire Marshal.
(2) Any person wishing to engage in the business of an elevator
contractor shall apply for and obtain an elevator contractor license from
the State Fire Marshal. The application shall be on a form provided by
the State Fire Marshal.
(3) Each application for an elevator mechanic license shall contain:
(a) The name and address of the applicant If an individual, the
name, residence and business address, and social security number of the
applicant;
(b) A contact email address If a partnership, the name, residence
-7-

LB435 LB435
2025 2025
and business address, and social security number of each partner;
(c) A contact telephone number If a domestic corporation, the name
and business address of the corporation and the name, residence address,
and social security number of the principal officer of the corporation;
and if a corporation other than a domestic corporation, the name and
address of an agent located locally who is authorized to accept service
of process and official notices;
(d) The number of years the applicant has engaged in the business of
installing, inspecting, maintaining, or servicing conveyances;
(e) The approximate number of individuals to be employed by the
applicant and, if applicable, satisfactory evidence that the employees
are or will be covered by workers' compensation insurance;
(f) Satisfactory evidence that the applicant is or will be covered
by general liability, personal injury, and property damage insurance;
(e) (g) Permission for the State Fire Marshal to access the criminal
history record information of individuals, partners, or officers
maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation through the Nebraska
State Patrol; and
(h) A description of all accidents causing personal injury or
property damage in excess of one thousand dollars involving conveyances
installed, inspected, maintained, or serviced by the applicant; and
(f) (i) Such other information as the State Fire Marshal may by rule
and regulation require.
(4) Each application for an elevator contractor license shall
contain:
(a) All information required under subsection (3) of this section;
(b) The name and address of the business;
(c) The approximate number of employees to be employed by the
applicant and, if applicable, satisfactory evidence that the employees
are or will be covered by workers' compensation insurance;
(d) Satisfactory evidence that the applicant is or will be covered
-8-

LB435 LB435
2025 2025
by general liability, personal injury, and property damage insurance;
(e) A description of all accidents causing personal injury or
property damage in excess of one thousand dollars involving conveyances
installed, inspected, maintained, or serviced by the applicant; and
(f) The name, telephone number, and Nebraska elevator mechanic
license number of a licensed elevator mechanic employed by or contracted
with the business Social security numbers on applications shall not be
made public or be considered a part of a public record.
Sec. 10. Section 81-5,239, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-5,239 (1) Any person may make a request for an investigation into
an alleged violation of the Conveyance Safety Act by giving notice to the
State Fire Marshal or state elevator inspector of such violation or
danger.
(2) Upon receipt of a request for an investigation, the State Fire
Marshal or state elevator inspector shall perform a preliminary inquiry
into the charges contained in the request for investigation. A request
for an investigation may be made in person or in writing by telephone
call and shall set forth with reasonable particularity the grounds for
the request for an investigation. During the preliminary inquiry, the
name, address, and telephone number of the person making the request for
an investigation shall be available only to the State Fire Marshal, state
elevator inspector, or other person carrying out the preliminary inquiry
on behalf of the State Fire Marshal or state elevator inspector. The
State Fire Marshal or state elevator inspector shall keep a record of
each request for an investigation received under this section for three
years after such request is made.
(3) If after the preliminary inquiry the State Fire Marshal or state
elevator inspector determines that there are reasonable grounds to
believe that such violation or danger exists and is likely to continue to
exist such that the operation of the conveyance endangers the public, the
-9-

LB435 LB435
2025 2025
State Fire Marshal or state elevator inspector shall cause a formal
investigation to be made. During the formal investigation, a statement
shall be taken from the person who made the request for an investigation
and the person's name, address, and telephone number shall be made
available to any opposing parties upon request.
(4) If the State Fire Marshal or state elevator inspector determines
that there are no reasonable grounds to believe that a violation or
danger exists under either subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the
State Fire Marshal shall notify the person requesting the investigation
in writing of such determination.
Sec. 11. Original sections 81-5,213, 81-5,215, 81-5,216, 81-5,217,
81-5,218, 81-5,219, 81-5,221, 81-5,223, 81-5,230, and 81-5,239, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-10-